Tennessee, session 114, HB0490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-21-111(c), is amended by adding
the following after the first sentence:
The report may be submitted in electronic format.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0490
001803
- 1 -